Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.090

Property liable to execution.

All property, real and personal, of the judgment debtor that is not exempted by law is liable to execution.

[ 1987 c 442 s 409; 1929 c 25 s 6; RRS s 518. Prior: Code 1881 s 333; 1877 p 70 s 337; 1854 p 177 s 251. Formerly RCW 6.04.060.]